North Carolina, session 2025, SB596.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund,
established in G.S. 143C-3-4.1(a), to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
the sum of one hundred sixty-nine million dollars ($169,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to North Carolina Central University to be used for the
following:
(1) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for campus-wide use to address
critical HVAC, fire safety, and building code deficiencies to repair, upgrade,
and replace failing plumbing, HVAC infrastructure, fire alarm, building code,
and mechanical systems across the campus.
(2) Nine million dollars ($9,000,000) for campus-wide roof replacements and
building envelope repairs to prevent further damage and reduce future costs
to prevent water damage, mold growth, and further structural deterioration
across campus.
(3) Sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) to replace failing electrical, storm and
domestic water, and steam distribution infrastructure; overhaul electrical and
steam distribution systems to prevent energy loss and reduce the associated
costs; and replace systems and their components that are at end-of-life and
require immediate replacement.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S596-v-1*